Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 2
REFUNDING BONDED INDEBTEDNESS

31-21-201. Definitions.

As used in this part 2, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Net effective interest rate" of a proposed issue of refunding bonds means the net interest cost of said refunding issue divided by the sum of the products derived by multiplying the principal amount of such refunding issue maturing on each maturity date by the number of years from the date of said proposed refunding bonds to their respective maturities. The "net effective interest rate" of an outstanding issue of bonds to be refunded means the net interest cost of said issue to be refunded divided by the sum of the products derived by multiplying the principal amounts of such issue to be refunded maturing on each maturity date by the number of years from the date of the proposed refunding bonds to the respective maturities of the bonds to be refunded. In all cases the net effective interest rate shall be computed without regard to any option of redemption prior to the designated maturity dates of the bonds.

"Net interest cost" of a proposed issue of refunding bonds means the total amount of interest to accrue on said refunding bonds from their date to their respective maturities less the amount of any premium above par at which said refunding bonds are being or have been sold. "Net interest cost" of an outstanding issue of bonds to be refunded means the total amount of interest which would accrue on said outstanding bonds from the date of the proposed refunding bonds to the respective maturity dates of said outstanding bonds to be refunded. In all cases the net interest cost shall be computed without regard to any option of redemption prior to the designated maturity dates of the bonds.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1136, § 1, effective July 1; (3) added, p. 1274, § 1, effective April 9.

L. 89:

(3) repealed, p. 1135, § 85, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-21-201 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-21-202. Refunding bonds - amount.

The governing body of any municipality may issue negotiable coupon bonds, to be denominated refunding bonds, for the purpose of refunding any of the bonded indebtedness of such municipality, whether due or not or which is payable at the option of such municipality, by consent of the bondholders, or by any lawful means. The amount of the refunding bonds to be issued under the provisions of this part 2 shall first be determined by the governing body, and a certificate of such determination shall be made and entered in and upon the records of the municipality prior to the issuance of said refunding bonds.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1136, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-21-202 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-21-203. Vote of electors not required.

Whenever such governing body deems it expedient to issue refunding bonds under the provisions of this part 2 and the net interest cost and the net effective interest rate of the proposed issue of refunding bonds does not exceed the net interest cost and net effective interest rate of the issue of bonds to be refunded, such refunding bonds may be issued without the submission of the question of issuing such refunding bonds to a vote of the registered electors of such municipality. The issuance of bonds under this part 2 for the purpose of refunding bonds which were originally issued to supply water to such municipality shall not require approval of such electors.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1136, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-21-203 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-21-204. Vote of electors required - procedures.

When such governing body deems it expedient to issue refunding bonds under the provisions of this part 2 and either the net interest cost or the net effective interest rate of the proposed issue of refunding bonds exceeds the net interest cost or the net effective interest rate, respectively, of the issue of bonds to be refunded, the governing body, by ordinance or resolution, shall submit the question of issuing said refunding bonds at a special election called and held for that purpose or at a regular election of the officers of such municipality; but bonds issued under this part 2 for the purpose of refunding bonds which were originally issued to supply water to such municipality shall not require such approval of the registered electors. An election held under this section shall be held in the manner provided for the authorization of an original bonded indebtedness in section 31-15-302 (1)(d).

At any election held under the provisions of this part 2, the question of authorizing the refunding of all or any part of the then outstanding bonded indebtedness of the municipality may be submitted as one question for determination whether such bonds are of the same or of different issues.

The election shall be conducted as nearly as possible in conformity with the provisions of the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965".

The election notice shall specify, in addition to the time and places for holding said election, the qualifications for persons to vote on such question, the amount and date of the bonds to be refunded, the amount of refunding bonds proposed to be issued, and the maximum net effective interest rate at which they may be issued.

At such election the ballots or voting machine tabs shall contain the words "For the Refunding Bonds" and "Against the Refunding Bonds".

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1136, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-21-204 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965", see article 10 of this title.

31-21-205. Ordinance for bond issue - bonds.

If the governing body determines to issue refunding bonds without an election by meeting the requirements set forth in sections 31-21-202 to 31-21-204 or if, upon canvassing the vote cast at any election held under the provisions of this part 2, it is determined by the governing body that a majority of the votes cast upon the question submitted are in favor of refunding, the governing body shall make such determination a part of the official records of the municipality and shall immediately thereafter adopt and make a law of the municipality, an ordinance providing for the issuance of said refunding bonds in accordance with the provisions of this part 2.

Such ordinance shall fix the date of said refunding bonds, shall designate the denominations thereof, shall designate the maximum net effective interest rate, the rate of interest of individual bonds, the maturity dates, and the place or alternate places of payment, within or without the state of Colorado, of both principal and interest, and shall prescribe the form of said refunding bonds.

Such refunding bonds shall be negotiable in form, shall recite the title of the act under which they are issued, and shall be executed in the name of the municipality and signed by the mayor, countersigned by the treasurer, with the seal of the municipality affixed thereto, and attested by the clerk. The interest accruing on such refunding bonds shall be evidenced by interest coupons thereto attached bearing the engraved facsimile signature of the treasurer of the municipality. When so executed, such coupons shall be the binding obligations of the municipality, according to their import.

In the adoption of said ordinance providing for the issuance of said refunding bonds, the governing body shall make the principal of the debt payable in annual or semiannual installments commencing not later than five years after the date of such bonds and maturing during a period not exceeding thirty-five years from the date thereof. The amounts of such maturities shall be fixed by the governing body. The right to redeem all or any part of said issue of bonds prior to the respective maturities thereof and the order of any such redemption may be reserved in said ordinance, and, if so reserved, shall be set forth on the face of said bonds.

Outstanding bonds which are secured by a pledge of specific special funds or revenues of the municipality in addition to the general ad valorem tax revenues of said municipality may be refunded under the provisions of this part 2, and substantial compliance with the provisions of this part 2 is deemed and taken to be sufficient to legally authorize such refunding and the issuance of refunding bonds for such purpose without further actions being taken by the municipality. Such a pledge of specific special funds or revenues need not be made to additionally secure the refunding bonds so issued, but such funds or revenues may be so pledged if it is deemed advisable by the governing body of the municipality.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1137, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-21-205 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-21-206. Exchange - sale - proceeds - amounts.

Such refunding bonds may be exchanged dollar for dollar for the bonds to be refunded, or they may be sold at, above, or below their par value at a price such that the net effective interest rate of the issue of refunding bonds does not exceed the maximum net effective interest rate authorized. Such refunding bonds shall be in a principal amount not exceeding the principal amount of the bonds to be refunded, as directed by the governing body, and the proceeds thereof shall be applied only to the purpose for which such refunding bonds were issued. The principal amount of said refunding bonds may be the same or less than the principal amount of the bonds to be refunded if due, adequate, and sufficient provision has been made for the payment, or redemption, and retirement of said bonds to be refunded and the payment of the interest accrued thereon in accordance with this part 2.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1138, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-21-206 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-21-207. Tax for payment of refunding bonds.

The interest accruing on such refunding bonds issued pursuant to the provisions of this part 2 prior to the time when the proceeds of tax levies are available therefor shall be paid out of the general revenues or any other revenues of the municipality available therefor. For the purpose of reimbursing such general revenues or other revenues and for the payment of subsequently accruing interest, the governing body issuing such refunding bonds shall certify and the board of county commissioners of the county in which the city or town is located shall levy, annually, a sufficient tax upon all the taxable property in the municipality fully to discharge such interest. For the ultimate payment or redemption of such refunding bonds, there shall be certified and levied annually such a tax upon all the taxable property in such municipality as will create a fund sufficient to pay or redeem and discharge such refunding bonds at or prior to their respective maturities. In the event the bonds to be redeemed and the interest thereon accruing would have been paid from taxes levied upon only part of the taxable property in the municipality, the taxes levied for payment or redemption of the refunding bonds and the interest accruing thereon shall be levied in the same manner and upon only the same taxable property as would have been levied for payment of the bonds to be refunded if no refunding of said bonds had been made and accomplished. As collected, all taxes levied for payment of interest on and for the payment or redemption of the principal of such bonds shall be kept by the treasurer of the municipality in a special fund to be used only in the payment of the interest upon and for the payment or redemption of the principal of such bonds. Such tax shall be levied and collected in the same manner as other municipal taxes are levied and collected. The ordinance authorizing the issuance of said bonds shall set forth the years in which such taxes shall be levied for the creation of said fund.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1138, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-21-207 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-21-208. Ordinance not to be altered.

Any ordinance authorizing an issue of refunding bonds under the provisions of this part 2 and providing for the levy of taxes for the payment of the interest upon and the principal of such refunding bonds shall not be altered or repealed until the indebtedness thereby authorized has been fully paid.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1139, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-21-208 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-21-209. Consolidated city or town - refunding indebtedness of constituent portions - bonds.

When any city or town consolidates with another city or town under the laws of the state of Colorado and has incurred a bonded indebtedness prior to such consolidation, such bonded indebtedness may be refunded by the consolidated city or town under the provisions of this part 2, as is provided for the refunding of other bonds in the same manner as it would have been the duty or within the power of the city council or board of trustees of the city or town which contracted such indebtedness to do had no such consolidation taken place. All the provisions of this part 2, including elections authorizing issuance of such refunding bonds, shall apply only within the former limits of the city or town which contracted such indebtedness. All refunding bonds so issued shall state in substance that they, together with interest thereon, are payable only by levies upon property situated within such limits as the same existed prior to such consolidation, unless the terms of consolidation shall provide that such refunding shall apply within the entire limits of the consolidated city or town.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1139, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-21-209 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-21-210. Combined issues - procedures.

Any refunding bonds may be issued to refund one or more issues of outstanding bonds of a municipality, but no two or more issues of outstanding bonds may be refunded by a single issue of refunding bonds unless the taxable property upon which tax levies are being made for payment of each such outstanding issue of bonds is identical to the taxable property on which such levies are being made for the payment of all other outstanding bonds proposed to be refunded by such single issue of refunding bonds. In the event that two or more issues of outstanding bonds of a municipality are to be refunded by the issuance of a single issue of refunding bonds as provided in this section, the net interest cost and net effective interest rate on the bonds to be refunded shall be computed as if all of said bonds had originally been combined as a single issue aggregating the total of the smaller issues, and the results of this computation shall be compared with the net interest cost and net effective interest rate on the whole of the single refunding issue for purposes of determining the necessity of submitting the question of issuing such refunding bonds to a vote of the registered electors of the municipality.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1139, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-21-210 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-21-211. Application of refunding bond proceeds - procedures - limitations.

The proceeds derived from the issuance of any refunding bonds under the provisions of this part 2 shall either be immediately applied to the payment, or redemption, and retirement of the bonds to be refunded and the cost and expense incident to such procedures or shall immediately be placed in escrow to be applied to the payment of said bonds upon their presentation therefor and the costs and expenses incident to such proceedings and for no other purpose whatsoever until the bonds being refunded have been paid in full and discharged and all accrued interest thereon has also been paid in full, upon which occurrences the escrow shall terminate, and any funds remaining therein shall be returned to the municipality and may be used to pay other bonds of the municipality.

The costs and expenses incident to the refunding of outstanding bonded indebtedness, the issuance of refunding bonds, and the establishment and maintenance of escrow accounts, pursuant to the provisions of this part 2, may be paid from any moneys or funds of the municipality which are legally available therefor. Any moneys or funds of the municipality legally available therefor may be placed in any escrow account established under the provisions of this part 2 and may be used and expended for the purposes specified in the escrow agreement if such procedure is deemed by the governing body to be in the best interests of the municipality.

Any escrowed funds, pending such use, may be invested or, if necessary, reinvested in securities meeting the investment requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S., maturing at such times as to insure the prompt payment of the bonds refunded under the provisions of this part 2 and the interest accruing thereon.

Escrowed funds and investments, together with any interest to be derived from such investments, shall be in an amount which at all times shall be sufficient to pay the bonds refunded as they become due at their respective maturities or as they are called for redemption and payment on prior redemption dates as to principal, interest, any prior redemption premium due, and any charges of the escrow agent payable therefrom, and the computations made in determining such sufficiency shall be verified by a certified public accountant.

For the purpose of implementing the provisions of this part 2, the governing body of any municipality has the power to enter into escrow agreements and to establish escrow accounts with any commercial bank having full trust powers located within the state of Colorado, which is a member of the federal deposit insurance corporation, under protective covenants and agreements whereby such accounts shall be fully secured by, or shall be invested in, securities meeting the investment requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S., in such amounts as will be sufficient and maturing at such times as to insure the prompt payment of the bonds refunded and the interest accruing thereon under the provisions of this part 2.

In no event shall the aggregate amount of bonded indebtedness of any municipality exceed the maximum allowable amount as determined pursuant to the state constitution, statutes, and charter applicable to such municipality. In determining and computing such aggregate amount of bonded indebtedness of any municipality, bonds which have been refunded as provided in this part 2, either by immediate payment, or redemption, and retirement or by the placement of the proceeds of refunding bonds in escrow shall not be deemed outstanding indebtedness from and after the date on which sufficient moneys are placed with the paying agent of such outstanding bonds for the purpose of immediately paying, or redeeming, and retiring such bonds or from and after the date on which the proceeds of said refunding bonds are placed in such an escrow.

The issuance of refunding bonds by any municipality for the purposes and in the manner authorized by this part 2 or under the provisions of any other law enabling such an issuance shall never be interpreted or taken to be the creation of an indebtedness such that the same would require the approval of the registered electors of the municipality, and no such approval shall be required for the issuance of such refunding bonds except as is specifically required by this part 2 or such other law under which said refunding bonds are sought to be issued or have been issued.

No bonds may be refunded under the provisions of this part 2 unless the holders thereof voluntarily surrender said bonds for immediate exchange or immediate payment or unless said bonds either mature or are callable for redemption prior to their maturity under their terms within ten years from the date of issuance of the refunding bonds, and provisions shall be made for paying, or redeeming, and discharging all of the bonds refunded within said period of time.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1139, § 1, effective July 1; (3) and (5) amended, p. 1274, § 2, effective April 9.

L. 89:

(3) and (5) amended, p. 1115, § 26, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-21-211 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-21-212. Registration of refunding bonds.

Whenever any municipality issues refunding bonds under the provisions of this part 2, the governing body shall direct that the clerk of said municipality, as a part of said clerk's duties, register said bonds in a book to be kept by him for that purpose, and, when so registered, the legality thereof shall not be open to contest by such municipality, or by any other person or corporation in behalf of such municipality for any reason whatever. It is the duty of the clerk to register said bonds, noting the principal amount, the date of issuance and maturity, and the rate of interest of said bonds.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1141, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-21-212 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-21-213. Redemption of refunding bonds prior to maturity - procedures.

If any bonds of a municipality, either bonds issued for refunding purposes or bonds issued for other purposes as set forth in section 31-15-302 (1)(d), are made redeemable prior to their respective maturities and the governing body determines that any part of such bonds should be called for redemption according to their terms, it is the duty of the clerk of such municipality, as soon as the governing body has authorized the redemption, to cause notice to be given of such action.

Such notice shall be given by publication at least once in a newspaper customarily used by said municipality for legal notices at least thirty days prior to the date on which said bonds are to be redeemed and paid. Such notice shall contain the date and place on which said bonds shall be redeemed and paid, shall describe the bonds by their legal designation, date, number, and amount, and shall state that after the date so fixed for redemption and payment the interest on said bonds shall cease.

After the date so fixed for redemption and payment, the bonds so called for redemption and payment shall cease to draw interest.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1141, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-21-213 as it existed prior to 1975.